Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2710.01
Report; contents.

(1) Any person that during a month acquired, purchased, sold, possessed, transferred, transported, or caused to be transported in or into this state cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family that was not in the directory at the time shall, within fifteen days following the end of that month, file a report in the manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner and certify to the state that the report is complete and accurate. The report shall contain, in addition to any further information that the Tax Commissioner may reasonably require to assist the Tax Commissioner in enforcing sections 69-2701 to 69-2711 and 77-2601 to 77-2623 and the Tobacco Products Tax Act, the following information:

(a) The total number of those cigarettes, in each case identifying by name and number of cigarettes (i) the manufacturers of those cigarettes, (ii) the brand families of those cigarettes, (iii) in the case of a sale or transfer, the name and address of the recipient of those cigarettes, (iv) in the case of an acquisition or purchase, the name and address of the seller or sender of those cigarettes, and (v) the other states in whose directory the manufacturer and brand family of those cigarettes were listed at the time and whose stamps the person is authorized to affix; and

(b) In the case of acquisition, purchase, or possession, the details of the person's subsequent sale or transfer of those cigarettes, identifying by name and number of cigarettes (i) the brand families of those cigarettes, (ii) the date of the sale or transfer, (iii) the name and address of the recipient, (iv) the number of stamps of each other state that the person affixed to the packages containing those cigarettes during that month, (v) the total number of cigarettes contained in the packages to which it affixed each respective other state's stamp, (vi) the manufacturers and brand families of the packages to which it affixed each respective other state's stamp, and (vii) a certification that it reported each sale or transfer to the taxing authority of the other state by fifteen days following the end of the month in which the sale or transfer was made and attaching a copy of all such reports. If the subsequent sale or transfer is from this state into another state in packages not bearing a stamp of the other state, the report shall also contain the information described in subdivision (2)(c) of section 77-2604.01.

(2) Reports under this section shall be in addition to reports under sections 69-2708, 77-2604, and 77-2604.01.

Laws 2011, LB590, § 14;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB9, § 5.

Tobacco Products Tax Act, see section 77-4001.